Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 1-102, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 329, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1-102), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-102. A Primary Election for federal, state, and
county officers shall be held on the third first Tuesday in June
March of each even-numbered year, at which time each political party
recognized by the laws of this state shall nominate its candidates
for the offices to be filled at the next succeeding General Election
unless otherwise provided by law. No candidate's name shall be
printed upon the General Election ballot unless such candidate shall
have been nominated as herein provided, unless otherwise provided by
law; provided further that this provision shall not exclude the
right of a nonpartisan candidate to have his or her name printed
upon the General Election ballots. No county, municipality or
school district shall schedule an election on any date during the
HB2425 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

twen ty (20) days immediately preceding the date of any such primary
election.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 1-103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-103. If at any Primary Election, as described in
Section 1-102 of this title, no candidate for the nomination for
office of any political party receives a majority of all votes cast
for all candidates of such party for the office, no candidate shall
be nominated by such party for the office, but the two candidates
receiving the highest number of votes at such election shall be
placed on the official ballot as candidates for such nomination at a
Runoff Primary Election to be held on the fourth third Tuesday of
August June in the same year. No county, municipality or school
district shall schedule an election on any date during the twenty
(20) days immediately preceding the date of any such Runoff Primary
Election.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 3-101, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 283, O.S.L. 2025 (26 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 3-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-101. A. No election required to be conducted by any
county election board shall be scheduled for a day other than
Tuesday.
B. Except as otherwise provided by law, no regular or special
election for any purpose shall be held by any county, school
HB2425 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

dist rict, technology center school district, municipality, fire
protection district, or other political subdivision authorized to
call elections except as follows:
1. The second Tuesday of February in any year;
2. The first Tuesday of March in any even-numbered year;
3. The first Tuesday of April in any year;
3. 4. The third Tuesday of June in any year;
4. 5. The fourth Tuesday of August in any odd-numbered year;
5. 6. The first Tuesday after the first Monday of November in
any year; and
6. 7. The second Tuesday of December, beginning in December of
2025, and every four (4) years thereafter.
C. In the event that a regular or special election date occurs
on an official state holiday, the election shall be scheduled for
the next following Tuesday. In the event that any day of a
candidate filing period occurs on a Saturday, Sunday, or any
official state holiday, that day of the filing period shall be
scheduled for the next business day.
D. For a special election called by the Governor as authorized
by law, the Governor shall be limited to the dates stated in
subsection B of this section. Provided, however, if a vacancy has
occurred in the office of a United States Representative, State
Senator, or State Representative, or in the event of a declared
national or state emergency that requires a special election, the
HB2425 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Gove rnor may also call a special election as authorized by law on
the following dates:
1. The second Tuesday of January in any year;
2. The first Tuesday of March in any year;
3. The first Tuesday of May in an odd-numbered year;
4. The second Tuesday of July in an odd-numbered year;
5. The second Tuesday of September in an odd-numbered year;
6. The first Tuesday of October in an odd-numbered year; and
7. The second Tuesday of December in any year.
E. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any provision
of a municipal charter, any municipality, school district,
technology center district, county, rural fire protection district,
or any other entity seeking to hold a regular or special election to
be conducted by a county election board on the same date as a
regular or special federal or state election, shall file the
resolution calling for the election with the county election board
secretary no later than seventy-five (75) days prior to the election
date. A candidate filing period of three (3) days, if so required
by the resolution, shall begin no later than ten (10) days following
the deadline to file the resolution with the secretary of the county
election board; provided, the filing period for such municipal
office may be scheduled on the same dates as the filing period for
state or federal office to be filled at such election.

HB2425 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

F. Any school district, technology center district,
municipality, including any municipality governed by charter, rural
fire protection district, or any other entity seeking to hold a
special election for the purpose of filling a vacancy shall schedule
a candidate filing period of three (3) days to begin not more than
twenty (20) days following the date the resolution calling the
election is required to be filed with the secretary of the county
election board.
G. The provisions of this section shall apply to elections held
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-119, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4-119. Any registered voter may make application under
oath to change political affiliation by executing a form prescribed
by the Secretary of the State Election Board at any time. The
county election board secretary in the applicant's county of
residence shall process and approve any such application for
political affiliation change upon receipt, except as provided in
Section 4-110.1 of this title and except during the period from
April 1 December 1 in an odd-numbered year through August 31,
inclusive, in any June 30 of the subsequent even-numbered year. The
secretary shall process and approve such applications for change of
political affiliation received or postmarked from April 1 December 1
in an odd-numbered year through August 31 in any June 30 of the
HB2425 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

subs equent even-numbered year after August 31 June 30 of the
subsequent even-numbered year.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 5-110, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 329, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 5-110), is amended to read as follows:
Section 5-110. A. Declarations of Candidacy provided herein
must be filed with the secretary of the appropriate election board
no earlier than 8:00 a.m. on the first Wednesday of April Monday in
December of any even-numbered odd-numbered year and no later than
5:00 p.m. on the next succeeding Friday Wednesday. Such
Declarations of Candidacy may be transmitted by United States mail,
but in no event shall the secretary of any election board accept
such Declarations after the time prescribed by law.
B. 1. A supplemental candidate filing period shall be held
beginning at 8:00 a.m. on the first Wednesday in April of each even-
numbered year and ending at 5:00 p.m. on the next succeeding Friday
for candidates of any newly formed political party recognized
pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-108 of this title. Such
party may submit a Declaration of Candidacy provided herein on
behalf of no more than one candidate for each office, to be filed
with the secretary of the appropriate election board;
2. Each Declaration of Candidacy shall be accompanied by the
petition or candidate filing fee as provided in Section 5-112 of
this title; and
HB2425 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

3. Each candidate who files during the supplemental filing
period described herein shall be deemed to be the new party's
nominee for that office, and shall be placed on General Election
ballot as provided by law. Provided, the eligibility of any
candidate who files during the supplemental candidate filing period
may be contested pursuant to the provisions of Section 5-118 of this
title.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 5-119, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-119. The petition must be filed no later than 5:00
p.m. on the second business day following the close of the filing
period during which the candidate filed.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 8-103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 8-103. The county election board secretary shall
certify a list of successful candidates for county offices and shall
provide Certificates of Election to the same following the General
Election, except that Certificates of Election may be issued to
unopposed candidates after 5 p.m. on the second business day
following the close of the filing period described in subsection B
of Section 5-110 of this title. The Secretary of the State Election
Board shall certify a list of successful candidates for offices for
which the Board Secretary accepts filings of Declarations of
Candidacy and shall provide Certificates of Election to the same
HB2425 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

foll owing the General Election, except that Certificates of Election
may be issued to unopposed candidates after 5 p.m. on the second
business day following the close of the filing period described in
subsection B of Section 5-110 of this title.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES, dated 03/09/2026 - DO PASS,
As Amended.

















HB2425 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.